Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5746.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 234g. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an individual who intentionally discharges a firearm at a motor vehicle that the individual knows or has reason to believe is occupied is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who violates subsection (1) and who knows or has reason to believe that the vehicle is occupied by a minor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act may be referred to as "Messiah's Law".